Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1412
Agreement; controlling provisions.

If the director enters into any agreement authorized by the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act and the provisions set forth in the agreement are in conflict with any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated by the director, the agreement shall control to the extent of any conflict.

Laws 1988, LB 836, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 32.